New Jersey, session 221, A2348.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  R.S.19:14-22 is amended to read as follows: 19:14-22.  The official general election sample ballots shall be as nearly as possible facsimiles of the official general election ballot to be voted at such election and shall have printed thereon, after the words which indicate the number of the election district for which such sample ballots are printed, the name of the school district, when appropriate, the number or name and municipality or municipalities of the fire district, when appropriate, the street address or location of the polling place in the election district, and the hours between which the polls shall be open.  Such sample ballots shall be printed on paper different in color from the official general election ballot, contain a watermark clearly identifying the sample ballot as a sample ballot,  and have the following words printed in large type at the top: "This ballot cannot be voted.  It is a sample copy of the official general election ballot used on election day."  The sample ballot shall also state clearly the days, hours and places at which early voting shall be available in the county. (cf: P.L.2021, c.40, s.11) 2.  R.S.19:23-31 is amended to read as follows: 19:23-31.  The official primary sample ballot shall be, as nearly as possible, a facsimile of the official primary ballot to be voted at the primary election and shall contain a watermark clearly identifying the sample ballot as a sample ballot and shall be printed on paper different in color from the official primary ballot, so that the same may be readily distinguished from the official primary ballot. It shall state clearly the days, hours, and places at which early voting shall be available in the county.  The official primary sample ballot shall have printed at the top in large type the words:  "This official primary sample ballot is an exact copy of the official primary ballot to be used on primary election day.  This ballot cannot be voted."  The official primary sample ballot shall also have printed thereon, following the words which indicate the election district, the following words: "The polling place for this election district is (Stating the location of said polling place)." (cf: P.L.2021, c.40, s.14) 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.